Wyoming, session 2025, HB0220.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-15-103 by creating a new subsection
(s) and 34-1-202(c) are amended to read:

9-15-103. Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust
account created; income account created; expenditures;
purposes.

HB0220

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0551
(s) No funds shall be disbursed under this act for
the purchase of any conservation easement that is not in
compliance with the duration requirements of W.S.
34-1-202(c).

34-1-202. Creation; conveyance; acceptance and
duration.

(c) Except as provided by W.S. 34-1-203(b), a
conservation easement is unlimited in duration unless the
instrument creating the easement provides otherwise.
Beginning July 1, 2025, no conservation easement shall be
created with a duration greater than thirty (30) years but
may allow an opportunity for renewal of the conservation
easement upon expiration of the specified duration. No
conservation easement that violates the durational
requirement of this subsection shall be conveyed, recorded
or assigned.

Section 2.

(a) This act applies to all conservation easements
created on and after July 1, 2025.
HB0220

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0551

(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter,
amend or impair any contract or agreement entered into
before July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0220